District of Columbia statutes.
44-1051.08

Provisional and restricted licenses.

(a)

As an alternative to denial, suspension, revocation, or non-renewal of a license, the Department may:

(1)

Issue a provisional license if the nurse staffing agency is taking appropriate ameliorative action in accordance with a mutually-agreed-upon timetable; or

(2)

Issue a restricted license that prohibits the nurse staffing agency from accepting new clients or delivering certain specified services.

(b)

The Department may issue a provisional license to a new nurse staffing agency to afford the Department time to compile and evaluate evidence pertaining to whether the new agency is capable of complying with the provisions of this chapter, regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, and other applicable law.

(c)

A provisional license may be issued for a period not exceeding 90 days, and may be renewed not more than once.

March 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-74, § 8, 50 DCR 10914